Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1811
Board; membership; qualifications.

(1) The board shall consist of three professional members, one physician, and one public member appointed pursuant to section 38-158 until December 1, 2023.

(2) Beginning on December 1, 2023, the board shall consist of five members as follows: Three professional members, of which one shall be a licensed nutritionist or a licensed dietitian nutritionist and two shall be licensed dietitian nutritionists; one physician; and one public member.

(3) The members shall meet the requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 633;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 42.